Massachusetts, session 194th, H1613.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of Chapter 258 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended in line 6 after the word “county” by inserting the following words:- “and
except in the case where the damage to a claimant’s motor vehicle’s tire, rim or both is caused by
a state, county or municipal roadway shall be brought under sections 21 to 25 of chapter 218 of
the General Laws.”
of 1